Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.292

Office of military and veteran legal assistance—Duties.

The office of military and veteran legal assistance shall:

(1) Recruit and train volunteer attorneys and identify service programs willing to perform pro bono services for service members, veterans, and their family members, and create and maintain a registry of the same;

(2) Assess and assign requests for pro bono services to volunteer attorneys and service programs registered with the office; and

(3) Establish an advisory committee that will include, among others, representatives from legal assistance offices on military installations, the office of civil legal aid, the Washington state bar association's legal assistance to military personnel section, the Washington state veterans bar association, relevant office of military service and support organizations, and organizations involved in coordinating, supporting, and delivering civil legal aid and pro bono legal services in Washington state. The committee shall provide advice and assistance regarding program design, operation, volunteer recruitment and support strategies, service delivery objectives and priorities, and funding.

[ 2017 c 163 s 2.]